Nebraska, session 109, LB677A.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB677A LB677A
2025 2025
Section 1. There is hereby appropriated (1) $1 from the Medical
Cannabis Control Fund for FY2025-26 and (2) $1 from the Medical Cannabis
Control Fund for FY2026-27 to the Nebraska Liquor Control Commission, for
Program 96, to aid in carrying out the provisions of Legislative Bill
677, One Hundred Ninth Legislature, First Session, 2025.
Total expenditures for permanent and temporary salaries and per
diems from funds appropriated in this section shall not exceed $1 for
FY2025-26 or $1 for FY2026-27.
Sec. 2. Since an emergency exists, this act takes effect when
passed and approved according to law.
-2-